Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska8-1,139
Misapplication of funds or assets; penalty.

An officer, director, agent, or employee of a bank, trust company, building and loan association, savings and loan association, credit union, or other similar entity which is chartered, licensed, regulated, or examined by the department who willfully misapplies any of the money, funds, or credits of any such entity or any money, funds, assets, or securities entrusted to the care or custody of such entity or the custody or care of any such officer, director, agent, or employee is guilty of a Class IV felony.

Laws 1984, LB 1039, § 6;

Laws 2003, LB 131, § 5;

Laws 2017, LB140, § 129.